Washington statutes.
RCW 7.16.160

Grounds for granting writ.

It may be issued by any court, except a district or municipal court, to any inferior tribunal, corporation, board or person, to compel the performance of an act which the law especially enjoins as a duty resulting from an office, trust or station, or to compel the admission of a party to the use and enjoyment of a right or office to which the party is entitled, and from which the party is unlawfully precluded by such inferior tribunal, corporation, board or person.

[ 1987 c 202 s 131; 1987 c 3 s 3; 1895 c 65 s 16; RRS s 1014.]

NOTES:

Intent—1987 c 202: See note following RCW 2.04.190.

Severability—1987 c 3: See note following RCW 3.70.010.